Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202479-531
Involvement of parents, guardians, and educational decisionmakers; public school district; adopt policy.

(1) On or before July 1, 2025, each public school district in the state shall develop and adopt a policy stating how the district will involve parents, guardians, or educational decisionmakers in the education of their children and the rights of each parent, guardian, or educational decisionmaker to:

(a) Access testing information and curriculum; and

(b) Request that a child be excused from specific instruction or activities.

(2) The policy of each public school district relating to how the district will seek to involve parents in the schools and what rights parents have relating to access to schools that is in effect prior to July 19, 2024, shall remain in effect until a new policy is developed and adopted on or before July 1, 2025, pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.

Laws 1994, LB 1161, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,243;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 284;

Laws 2024, LB71, § 2.
July 19, 2024